District of Columbia statutes.
4-553

Task force.

(a)

Beginning October 1, 2013, the Office shall establish a task force to:

(1)

Assess staff and technology needs of the Hotline; and

(2)

Develop mechanisms for administration of the Hotline; and

(3)

Develop standards that coincide with the standards used by the existing domestic violence first responder line.

(b)

The task force shall include representatives from the D.C. Coalition Against Domestic Violence, governmental victim services programs, and domestic violence programs.

(c)

By January 30, 2014, the task force shall transmit to the Office and to the Office of the Secretary to the Council a report that includes the assessments and developments completed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3034, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 3031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Domestic Violence Hotline Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.